New Jersey, session 221, A4403.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Secretary of Higher Education shall establish a Career and Technical Education Dual Enrollment Grant Program. The grant program shall provide grants to public institutions of higher education to expand or provide college-level career and technical education instruction to high school students through courses offered by the institution on its campus or in a high school. b.  The grant recipient shall use the funds to expand opportunities to earn college credits in career and technical education coursework while in high school. The secretary shall determine allowable uses for grant funds prior to accepting applications to participate in the grant program and shall describe the allowable uses in a notice of grant opportunity. c.  A public institution of higher education wishing to participate in the grant program shall submit an application to the secretary in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary. The application shall include: (1) the institutions plan for the establishment or expansion of dual enrollment programs in career and technical education; (2) information on any existing dual enrollment programs operated by the institution; (3) the institutions capacity to offer career and technical education dual enrollment coursework, in addition to traditional academic semester course offerings; (4) the number of students able to be supported by the grant program and the number of students expected to participate; and (5) any other information the secretary deems necessary. d.  The secretary shall establish selection criteria for awarding grant funds under the program, and shall award grants through a competitive process based upon review of the applications and subject to the availability of funds. The secretary shall give preference to programs that are designed to operate beyond the duration of available grant funding. The secretary shall establish the amount for each grant that is approved. 2.    The secretary shall submit a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), on the Career and Technical Education Dual Enrollment Grant Program established pursuant to section 1 of this act following each year in which grants are awarded. The report shall include, but not be limited to, information on the number of grant applicants, the number and amount of the grant awards, the number of students supported by the grant program, information on the impact of the grant program on workforce shortages in the State, and any recommendations concerning the continuation or expansion of the grant program. 3.    a.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education the sum of $5,000,000 to fund the Career and Technical Education Dual Enrollment Grant Program established pursuant to section 1 of this act. b.  The Legislature may appropriate additional amounts as necessary to the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education to fund the Career and Technical Education Dual Enrollment Grant Program. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, except the Secretary of Higher Education may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as necessary to implement the provisions of this act.